Hawaii statutes.
[§196-69] Reporting; annual
report. The
authority shall submit a report to the legislature on the authority's
activities in administering the loan program no later than twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session beginning with the regular session of
2015. The report shall include a description and uses
of the loan program; summary information and
analytical data concerning the implementation of the loan program; summary information and analytical data concerning
deployment of clean energy technology, demand response technology, and energy
use reduction and demand side management infrastructure, programs, and
services; and repayments made or credits provided to electric
utility customers under this part or chapter 269, part X. [L 2013, c 211,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next